Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.305

Who may be guardian for adult—Order of priority.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, the court in appointing a guardian for an adult shall consider persons qualified to be guardian in the following order of priority:

(a) A guardian, other than a temporary or emergency guardian, currently acting for the respondent in another jurisdiction;

(b) A person nominated as guardian by the respondent, including the respondent's most recent nomination made in a power of attorney;

(c) An agent appointed by the respondent under a power of attorney for health care;

(d) A spouse or domestic partner of the respondent;

(e) A relative or other individual who has shown special care and concern for the respondent; and

(f) A certified professional guardian or conservator.

(2) If two or more persons have equal priority under subsection (1) of this section, the court shall select as guardian the person the court considers best qualified. In determining the best qualified person, the court shall consider the person's relationship with the respondent, the person's skills, the expressed wishes of the respondent, the extent to which the person and the respondent have similar values and preferences, and the likelihood the person will be able to perform the duties of a guardian successfully.

(3) The court, acting in the best interest of the respondent, may decline to appoint as guardian a person having priority under subsection (1) of this section and appoint a person having a lower priority or no priority.

(4) A person that provides paid services to the respondent, or an individual who is employed by a person that provides paid services to the respondent or is the spouse, domestic partner, parent, or child of an individual who provides or is employed to provide paid services to the respondent, may not be appointed as guardian unless:

(a) The individual is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption; or

(b) The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person is the best qualified person available for appointment and the appointment is in the best interest of the respondent.

(5) An owner, operator, or employee of a long-term care facility at which the respondent is receiving care may not be appointed as guardian unless the owner, operator, or employee is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption.

[ 2019 c 437 s 309.]